Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.210

Unlawful practice—Evidence of.

It is prima facie evidence of the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery or of holding oneself out as a practitioner of podiatric medicine and surgery within the meaning of this chapter for any person to treat in any manner ailments of the human foot by medical, surgical, or mechanical means or appliances, or to use the title "podiatrist," "podiatric physician and surgeon," or any other words or letters which designate or tend to designate to the public that the person so treating or holding himself or herself out to treat, is a podiatric physician and surgeon.

[ 1990 c 147 s 16; 1982 c 21 s 17; 1973 c 77 s 17; 1935 c 48 s 4; 1921 c 120 s 6; 1917 c 38 s 10; RRS s 10083.]